Utah statutes.
53-3-303.5.   Driver License Medical Advisory Board -- Medical waivers.
(1)  The Driver License Medical Advisory Board shall:
(a)  advise the director of the division; and
(b)  establish and recommend in a manner specified by the board functional
ability profile guidelines and standards for determining the physical, mental,
and emotional capabilities of applicants for specific types of licenses,
appropriate to various driving abilities.
(2) (a)  The Driver License Medical Advisory Board shall establish fitness
standards, including provisions for a waiver of specified federal driver's
physical qualifications under 49 CFR 391.41, for intrastate commercial driving
privileges.
(b)  The standards under this Subsection (2) may only be implemented if the
United States Department of Transportation (USDOT) will not impose any
sanctions, including funding sanctions, against the state.
(3)  In case of uncertainty of interpretation of these guidelines and
standards, or in special circumstances, applicants may request a review of any
division decision by a panel of board members.  All of the actions of the
director and board are subject to judicial review.
(4) (a)  If a person applies for a waiver established under Subsection (2),
the applicant shall bear any costs directly associated with the cost of
administration of the waiver program, with respect to the applicant's
application, in addition to any fees required under Section 53-3-105.
(b)  The division shall establish any additional fee necessary to administer
the license under this Subsection (4) in accordance with Section 63J-1-504.
